Utah statutes.
63G-4-601.   Electronic records and conversion of written records by governmental agencies.

A governmental agency may make rules regarding electronic records and conversion of written records as prescribed by Title 46, Chapter 4, Part 5, Electronic Records in Government Agencies.

